Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 3. Abandoned Animals

§ 3511.
Abandoned animals; definition.

An animal shall be deemed to be abandoned when it is placed in the custody of a veterinarian, veterinary hospital, boarding kennel, stable, or other person or establishment for treatment, board, or care, and:

having been placed in custody for a specific period of time, the animal is not removed at the end of the specific period, and a notice to remove the animal within ten days thereafter has been given to the person placing the animal in custody by means of registered mail addressed to the last known address of the person; or

having been placed in custody for an unspecified period of time, the animal is not removed within ten days after notice to remove the animal has been given to the person placing the animal in custody by means of registered mail addressed to the last known address of the person.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 8, 1968.

§ 3512.
Waiver of lien.

The giving of notice as prescribed in section 3511 of this title shall be deemed a waiver of any lien on the animal for the treatment, board, or care of the animal but shall not relieve the owner of the animal of his or her contractual liability for the treatment, board, or care furnished.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 8, 1968.

§ 3513.
Disposal of abandoned animals.

Any person having in his or her care, custody, or control any abandoned animal as defined in section 3511 of this title may deliver the animal to any humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or in the case of dogs, cats, or other small animals, to any pound maintained by or for any town within which the animal was abandoned, or he or she may sell the animal, the proceeds from the sale to be applied to the contractual liability incurred by the person placing the animal.
If the person to whom the animal was abandoned is unable to sell the animal, it may be humanely euthanized by any veterinarian licensed to practice in Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 8, 1968.